Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.102

Unlawful advertising—Liability.

When determining a violation of RCW 18.27.100, the director and administrative law judge shall hold responsible the person who purchased or offered to purchase the advertising.

[ 1993 c 454 s 4; 1987 c 362 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 454: See note following RCW 18.27.010.